Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201749-1807
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

The Uniform Unsworn Foreign Declarations Act modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., as the act existed on January 1, 2017, but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

Laws 2017, LB57, § 9.
August 24, 2017